Georgia statutes. TITLE 47 Retirement and Pensions
Article 1 In General

47-1-1.
Intent of codification and enactment of this title.

The enactment of Title 47 of this Code is intended only as a recodification of the existing laws of this state relating to retirement and pensions. The codification and enactment of this title are not intended to nor shall they be construed to increase, diminish, grant, destroy, impair, alter, or otherwise affect any pension, retirement benefit or allowance, survivors benefit, membership or right to membership, creditable service or right thereto, prior service or right thereto, membership service or right thereto, or any option, election, or right of any kind which is in existence on November 1, 1982.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-1-1

; Ga. L. 2000, p. 131, § 1.

Editor’s notes.

This Code section was created as part of the Code revision and was thus enacted by Ga. L. 1981, Ex. Sess., p. 8 (Code enactment Act).

47-1-2.
Pooling of funds by retirement systems for investment purposes; accounting practices with regard to pooled funds.

The boards of trustees or directors, by whatever name known, of any two or more retirement systems created by general law, pursuant to the mutual consent of such boards, may pool their trust funds for the purposes of joint investment. The board of trustees or directors, by whatever name known, of any two or more local retirement systems funded by a single political subdivision may likewise pool their trust funds for the purposes of joint investment. When such pooling occurs, the board of trustees of the managing retirement system shall account for the pooled trust funds in accordance with generally accepted principles of accounting, in order to maintain separate accountability of such funds while under its management.

The pooled trust funds may be invested in accordance with Chapter 2 of this title, relating to the Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia, notwithstanding any other provisions of law to the contrary.

Nothing in this Code section shall establish a legal provision for combining the Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia with the Teachers Retirement System of Georgia.

History.

Ga. L. 1974, p. 1178, § 1; Ga. L. 1991, p. 994, § 1.

47-1-3.
Power of a local retirement system to hire an actuary; payment of the administrative costs of a local retirement system; periodic actuarial investigations; annual financial report.

As used in this Code section, the term “local retirement system” means any retirement, pension, or emeritus system covering an employee or employees of a county, municipality, local board of education, or other political subdivision, or any groups or classifications of such employees which is funded at least in part by such political subdivisions.

The board of trustees or other governing authority of each local retirement system is authorized and directed to designate and retain the services of a qualified actuary to provide technical advice and assistance to the board of trustees or governing authority in the management of the retirement system and in the preparation of surveys or reports required under this Code section.

Any political subdivision maintaining a local retirement system for an employee or employees or for classifications of employees is authorized to expend any public funds available to it to pay any portion of the administrative costs of the retirement system, if the funds available to the retirement system are not adequate to pay the administrative costs, notwithstanding any contrary provisions of any laws relative to such local retirement system.

Once every two years, the board of trustees or other governing authority of each local retirement system shall have the system’s actuary make an actuarial investigation. Such actuarial investigation shall include the results of any actuarial investigation into the then current assumptions as to rates of interest, mortality, disability, withdrawal, and retirement. The actuarial investigation shall also include consideration of the experience of the retirement system under its assumptions and a comparison of results with the previous actuarial investigations and may also include such other studies as may be necessary or desirable for the completeness and accuracy of the actuarial investigation. The actuarial investigation shall also include a valuation of the contingent assets and liabilities of the retirement system and a determination of the payments necessary to amortize over a stated period any unfunded accrued liability disclosed. As an exhibit to the actuarial investigation, the local retirement system board of trustees or other governing authority thereof shall attach a copy of all the provisions of the plan for the local retirement system, including the requirements and conditions for qualifying to participate, the nature of benefits under the plan, and the manner in which the local retirement system is funded. Beginning on October 1, 1996, and every two years thereafter on such date, the board of trustees or other governing authority of each such local retirement system shall have on file with the state auditor an actuarial investigation meeting the requirements of this subsection. This subsection shall not apply to a retirement or pension program which is established pursuant to an insurance contract between an insurer and a county, municipality, local board of education, or other political subdivision or between an insurer and any commission, board, or other agency of any such political subdivision. As used in the preceding sentence, the word “insurance” and the word “insurer” shall have the meanings set forth, respectively, in Code Section 33-1-2. Municipalities providing a retirement program for their employees pursuant to a contract with the Board of Trustees of the Georgia Municipal Employees Benefit System shall not be required to submit actuarial investigations under this subsection or financial reports under this Code section. In lieu of such actuarial investigations and reports, the Board of Trustees of the Georgia Municipal Employees Benefit System shall prepare a comprehensive report once every two years based on the information required under Code Sections 47-5-26 and 47-5-30. Such comprehensive reports shall be filed with the state auditor at the same time as actuarial investigations are filed as provided in this subsection. Any county providing a retirement program for its employees pursuant to a contract with, or a program offered by, the Association County Commissioners of Georgia shall also be exempt from the requirements of this subsection or financial reports under this Code section, if the Association County Commissioners of Georgia files with the state auditor, at the same time actuarial investigations are filed under this subsection, a comprehensive report substantially equivalent to the comprehensive report filed by the Board of Trustees of the Georgia Municipal Employees Benefit System as provided in this subsection. Nothing in this subsection shall be construed as to exempt either the Georgia Municipal Employees Benefit System or the Association County Commissioners of Georgia from the provisions of Code Section 47-20-4.

The board of trustees or other governing authority of each local retirement system shall file a financial report on such local retirement system with the state auditor at the same time each actuarial investigation is filed with the state auditor as provided by subsection (d) of this Code section.

The financial report shall include, for each of the two fiscal years covered by the report, the following information:

The receipts of the local retirement system, including member contributions, employer contributions, any other contributions, investment income, gains from the sale of the system’s assets, and any other receipts from whatever source derived;

The disbursements of the local retirement system, including benefit payments to retirees or beneficiaries, refunds to members, losses from the sale of the system’s assets, and administrative expenses of the system; and

The certificate of the chairperson of the board of trustees stating that the investment practices of the fund have been in compliance with the provisions of Article 7 of Chapter 20 of this title at all times during the reporting period or, if the practices have at any time been out of compliance with such provisions, providing a description of the noncompliance, the reason for the noncompliance, and the corrective action taken.

The financial report shall also include statistics on the membership and beneficiaries of the local retirement system. There shall be attached to the financial report an exhibit showing all amendments to or changes in the local retirement system which have been made since the filing of the previous actuarial investigation under subsection (d) of this Code section.

The first financial report shall be filed on October 1, 1996, and subsequent reports shall be filed every two years thereafter on October 1.

The financial reports, the actuarial investigations, and all exhibits thereto and modifications thereof shall be a matter of public record open to inspection by the public.

The financial reports required by this Code section shall apply to retirement or pension programs established pursuant to an insurance contract, as described by subsection (d) of this Code section.

History.

Ga. L. 1974, p. 1407, §§ 1-3; Ga. L. 1981, p. 931, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 47; Ga. L. 1987, p. 146, § 1; Ga. L. 1990, p. 190, § 1; Ga. L. 1996, p. 651, § 1; Ga. L. 2000, p. 2, § 14; Ga. L. 2001, p. 21, § 1.

Cross references.

Triennial actuarial investigations required for each retirement system of a political subdivision, §

47-20-21

.

Law reviews.

For article surveying developments in Georgia local government law from mid-1980 through mid-1981, see 33 Mercer L. Rev. 187 (1981).

47-1-4.
Report of the state auditor on the condition of local retirement systems.

Based on the most recent actuarial investigations on file pursuant to subsection (d) of Code Section 47-1-3 and financial reports submitted under subsections (e) through (j) of Code Section 47-1-3, the state auditor, once every two years beginning on January 1, 1997, shall submit a report on the condition of local retirement systems to the Governor and each member of the General Assembly. The report shall deal specifically with any local retirement system which the state auditor has reason to believe is not in actuarially sound condition or has not been in compliance with the provisions of Code Section 47-1-12. A copy of the state auditor’s report shall also be sent to the Attorney General and to the applicable governing authority of the political subdivision and the applicable board of trustees or other governing authority of the local retirement system which the state auditor finds is not in actuarially sound condition or has not been in compliance with the provisions of Article 7 of Chapter 20 of this title.

History.

Ga. L. 1981, p. 931, § 3; Ga. L. 1996, p. 651, § 2; Ga. L. 2001, p. 21, § 1.

Cross references.

Triennial report to include list of local retirement systems not in conformance with minimum funding standards, §

47-20-21

.

47-1-5.
Duty of governing authorities to make and file actuarial investigations and to file financial reports; withholding of state funds for failure to meet this duty.

It shall be the duty of the governing authority of each county, municipality, or other political subdivision whose employees are covered under a local retirement system and the duty of a local board of education whose employees are covered under a local retirement system to cause the actuarial investigations required by subsection (d) of Code Section 47-1-3 to be made and to cause such actuarial investigations to be filed with the state auditor as required by that subsection. It shall also be their duty to cause financial reports to be submitted to the state auditor as required by subsections (e) through (j) of Code Section 47-1-3. If a required actuarial investigation and financial report are not submitted, then within 30 days after the date on which such investigation and report were due in the office of the state auditor, the state auditor shall notify, in writing, the governing authority of the county, municipality, or other political subdivision whose employees are covered under the applicable local retirement system. If the actuarial investigation and financial report are not received by the state auditor within 60 days after the date such notice is sent to the governing authority, the state auditor shall notify the state treasurer; and it shall be the duty of the state treasurer to withhold any state funds payable to the applicable political subdivision or local board of education until the actuarial investigation and financial report are submitted to the state auditor. The state auditor shall advise the state treasurer within five days after receiving the actuarial investigation and financial report to release any state funds payable to the applicable political subdivision.

History.

Ga. L. 1981, p. 931, § 3; Ga. L. 1993, p. 1402, § 18; Ga. L. 2010, p. 863, §§ 3, 4/SB 296.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, substituted “state treasurer” for “director of the Office of Treasury and Fiscal Services” in the fourth and fifth sentences and substituted “state treasurer” for “director” in the fourth sentence.

47-1-6.
Effect of World War II armed forces service on retirement benefits; payments to retirement systems for such periods.

No veteran of World War II who was discharged other than dishonorably and who was furloughed from a position of employment with a county or municipal government which has a retirement or pension plan for the position occupied shall suffer or otherwise lose any seniority toward his retirement or pension by virtue of such service in the armed forces of the United States.

No such veteran shall be required to make any payments to any such retirement or pension fund for and during his period of service with the armed forces of the United States.

This Code section shall apply to a political subdivision of any county or municipality where such a retirement or pension plan is in effect.

History.

Ga. L. 1947, p. 858, §§ 1-3.

Cross references.

Rights of public officers and employees absent on military duty as members of organized militia or reserve forces, as such rights relate to retirement systems, §

38-2-279(f)

.

47-1-7.
Powers of retirement, pension, or emeritus systems or funds with regard to agents employed to act as custodians of assets or investment advisers.

The board of trustees or other person or body having the power to manage, invest, and reinvest the assets of any retirement, pension, or emeritus system or fund created under the laws of this state may authorize any agent, including a bank or trust company, employed to act as custodian of such assets or to act as an investment adviser and to make investments for such retirement, pension, or emeritus system or fund, provided that such agent has a nominee or nominees in whose name securities, including, without limitation, bonds, stocks, notes, and other evidence of title to intangible personal property, held by the agent may be registered, to register securities which are held under the terms of such agency in the name of the nominee or nominees, without mention of the agency relationship in the instrument evidencing such securities or on the books of the issuing entity. The records of such agent shall at all times clearly show that such securities are held in such agency capacity and shall indicate the beneficial owner of the securities. Such agent shall not be relieved of liability for the safe custody, control, and proper distribution of such securities or the income therefrom by reason of the registration of those securities in the name of any nominee. The authorization of any such agent to register securities in the name of such nominees shall be in writing and may contain such other restrictions as the board of trustees or other person or body charged with the management and investment of the assets of any such retirement, pension, or emeritus system or fund may deem appropriate.

History.

Ga. L. 1972, p. 427, § 1; Ga. L. 1987, p. 146, § 1; Ga. L. 2010, p. 1207, § 65/SB 436.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, substituted “adviser” for “advisor” in the middle of the first sentence.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2010, p. 1207, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “The intent of this Act is to repeal obsolete and inoperative provisions and to make certain stylistic corrections in Title 47 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated. Nothing in this Act shall deny, abridge, increase, renew, revive, or on any way affect any right, benefit, option, credit, or election to which any person was entitled pursuant to such title on June 30, 2010, and the board of trustees of each public retirement system is authorized and directed to provide by regulation for the continuation of any such right, benefit, option, credit, or election not otherwise covered in this Act; provided, however, that any such right, benefit, option, credit, or election shall be subject to the statutory provisions in effect on June 30, 2010.”

47-1-8.
Restrictions on ability of members of the General Assembly to receive pension plan credit for service in the General Assembly.

No person becoming a member of the General Assembly for the first time on or after July 1, 1984, shall be entitled to receive or shall receive any creditable service under any local retirement or pension system for service as a member of the General Assembly unless the law, ordinance, or resolution which is the source of authority for such local retirement or pension system specifically authorizes creditable service to be obtained under such local retirement or pension system for service in the General Assembly.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-1-8

, enacted by Ga. L. 1984, p. 758, § 1.

Cross references.

Crediting of time served in General Assembly to pension plan of political subdivision, §

28-1-9

.

47-1-9.
Crediting of time toward Georgia Legislative Retirement System; restriction on crediting; options for members; refund of contributions; construction of conflicting provisions.

Except as provided by subsection (b) of this Code section, any member of the General Assembly holding office on January 1, 1986, may obtain creditable service for membership in the General Assembly obtained on and after that date only for the purposes of the Georgia Legislative Retirement System, and no service as a member of the General Assembly which is obtained after December 31, 1985, by any such member shall be creditable or used as creditable service for the purposes of any other public retirement or pension system of this state.

Subject to the limitations of paragraph (2) of this subsection, the provisions of subsection (a) of this Code section shall not apply to any member of the General Assembly holding office on January 1, 1986, who:

Was a member of the Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia on that date; and

Received annual compensation as a member and officer of the General Assembly during calendar year 1985, on which employee contributions to the Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia were based, exceeding the average annual compensation of all members of the Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia for calendar year 1985.

Any member of the General Assembly subject to the provisions of paragraph (1) of this subsection who continues to receive annual compensation on and after January 1, 1986, as a member and officer of the General Assembly exceeding the average annual compensation of all members of the Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia may continue membership in said retirement system.

Any person becoming a member of the General Assembly after December 31, 1985, shall be eligible to obtain creditable service as a member of the General Assembly only for the purposes of the Georgia Legislative Retirement System, and no service as a member of the General Assembly which is obtained on or after January 1, 1986, by any such person shall be creditable or used as creditable service for the purposes of any other public retirement or pension system of this state.

Notwithstanding any provisions of Chapter 6 of this title or any other law, any member of the General Assembly may withdraw from membership in the Georgia Legislative Retirement System and receive a refund of contributions to such system under Code Section 47-6-85. Any member exercising the option provided by this subsection may not at any time thereafter reestablish membership in the Georgia Legislative Retirement System or become a member of any public retirement or pension system while serving as a member of the General Assembly.

The provisions of this Code section shall control over conflicting or inconsistent provisions of any other law of this state, specifically including any law relating to any public retirement or pension system of this state. It is the intention of the General Assembly that this Code section may not be repealed, superseded, or modified by implication through the enactment of any other law or through the amendment of any existing law, and any modification or repeal of the requirements of this Code section shall be accomplished only by amendment to or repeal of this specific Code section.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-1-9

, enacted by Ga. L. 1985, p. 1334, § 1; Ga. L. 1987, p. 146, § 1; Ga. L. 2010, p. 1207, § 2/SB 436.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, deleted the former last sentence of paragraph (b)(2), which read: “If during any calendar year the annual compensation of any such member of the General Assembly is equal to or less than the average annual compensation of all members of the Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia for that calendar year, then on the first day of January immediately following such calendar year such member of the General Assembly shall be subject to the provisions of subsection (c) of this Code section, and for the purposes of this paragraph, any reference in said subsection (c) to January 1, 1986, shall mean the first day of January immediately following such calendar year.”; deleted former subsection (c); and redesignated former subsections (d) through (f) as present subsections (c) through (e), respectively.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1985, p. 1334, § 3, not codified by the General Assembly, provided that that Act would become effective for administrative purposes upon its approval by the Governor or upon its otherwise becoming law and would become effective for all purposes on January 1, 1986. The Act was approved April 10, 1985.

Ga. L. 1985, p. 1334, § 2, not codified by the General Assembly, provided as follows: “This Act is pursuant to the authority of Article III, Section X, Paragraph VI of the Constitution and pursuant to the specific authority of subparagraph (d) of said Paragraph VI, this Act is exempt from the provisions of Chapter 20 of Title 47 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, known as the ‘Public Retirement Systems Standards Law.’ ”

Ga. L. 2010, p. 1207, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “The intent of this Act is to repeal obsolete and inoperative provisions and to make certain stylistic corrections in Title 47 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated. Nothing in this Act shall deny, abridge, increase, renew, revive, or on any way affect any right, benefit, option, credit, or election to which any person was entitled pursuant to such title on June 30, 2010, and the board of trustees of each public retirement system is authorized and directed to provide by regulation for the continuation of any such right, benefit, option, credit, or election not otherwise covered in this Act; provided, however, that any such right, benefit, option, credit, or election shall be subject to the statutory provisions in effect on June 30, 2010.”

47-1-10.
Adoption, amendment, or repeal of rules by boards of trustees of state retirement or pension systems; procedure; immediate adoption; filing of rules with Secretary of State; adoption of rules and regulations appropriate or necessary to maintain qualified status.

As used in this Code section, the term:

“Board of trustees” means the board of trustees or other administrative body or agency charged with the duty of administering any public retirement or pension system created by this title, except the Board of Trustees of the Georgia Municipal Employees Benefit System provided for by Chapter 5 of this title.

“Employer” means a state department, official, or agency of the state or a local board of education, local elected official, or a local political subdivision which employs members.

“Member” means a member of a public retirement or pension system created by this title.

“Member organization” means any association of public employees or officials whose membership consists primarily of members of a public retirement or pension system created by this title.

“Rule” means any rule or regulation adopted by a board of trustees for the administration or to aid in the administration of a public retirement or pension system created by this title, except rules or regulations governing or relating to the investment of the funds or assets of any such retirement or pension system by any such board of trustees.

“Small retirement system” means any public retirement or pension system created by this title which has less than 200 members.

Prior to the adoption, amendment, or repeal of any rule, a board of trustees shall:

Give at least 30 days’ notice of the intended action. The notice shall include an exact copy of the proposed rule, the date on which the board of trustees will consider the adoption of the rule, and the time and place where the board of trustees shall meet for such purpose. The notice shall also contain a citation of the authority pursuant to which the rule is proposed for adoption and, if the proposal is an amendment to or repeal of an existing rule, the existing rule shall be clearly identified. The notice shall be mailed to all members of the respective retirement or pension system who have requested in writing to the board of trustees to be placed on a mailing list for proposed rules, provided that such mailing list shall not exceed 200 such members. If more than 200 members request to be placed on such mailing list, the board of trustees shall confine the list to the first 200 members making written request to the board of trustees to be placed on the mailing list. The board of trustees of any small retirement system may, at its discretion, mail the notice to all members. The notice shall also be mailed to employers and to member organizations of the respective public retirement or pension systems. Employers shall post such notices on bulletin boards for their respective employees and shall otherwise take reasonable steps to assure that members of the respective retirement or pension systems are made aware of the notice; and

Afford members of the retirement or pension system affected by the proposed rule a reasonable opportunity to submit to the board of trustees, in writing, data, views, or arguments relative to the proposed rule. Any such submissions received by the board of trustees prior to the adoption of the proposed rule shall be considered by the board of trustees.

At the time of the distribution of the notices required by paragraph (1) of subsection (b) of this Code section, the respective boards of trustees shall transmit a copy of such notices to each member of the House and Senate standing committees on retirement for review by such committees. If, prior to the adoption of the rule by the respective board of trustees, the chairman of either such committee notifies such board of trustees that the committee objects to the adoption of the rule or has questions concerning the purpose, nature, or necessity of the rule, it shall be the duty of such board of trustees to consult with the committee prior to the adoption of the rule.

If a board of trustees finds that the immediate adoption of a rule is necessary to secure or protect the interests of the members of its respective public retirement or pension system, such rule may be adopted on an emergency basis without following the procedures required by this Code section. In that event, the board of trustees shall adopt a resolution declaring the existence of an emergency and explaining the basis for such declaration as a condition necessary to adopt a rule on an emergency basis. Any rule adopted pursuant to the authority of this subsection shall expire in not more than 120 days immediately following its adoption, but the adoption of an identical rule pursuant to the requirements of this Code section is not precluded.

By not later than January 1, 1986, each board of trustees shall file with the Secretary of State a certified copy of all rules which were adopted by such board of trustees during the period beginning on January 1, 1979, and ending on July 1, 1985. Any rule adopted by a board of trustees during such period which is not filed with the Secretary of State by January 1, 1986, shall be void and of no force and effect after January 1, 1986. It shall not be necessary for rules adopted by boards of trustees prior to January 1, 1979, to be filed with the Secretary of State and such rules shall continue in force and effect until repealed by the respective boards of trustees, but if any such rule is amended on or after July 1, 1985, the original rule as amended shall be filed with the Secretary of State.

Except pursuant to the authority of subsection (d) of this Code section, each rule adopted by a board of trustees on or after July 1, 1985, shall not become effective until the expiration of at least 20 days after an original and two copies of the rule are filed in the office of the Secretary of State.

Rules which are required to be filed with the Secretary of State by paragraphs (1) and (2) of this subsection shall contain a citation of the authority pursuant to which the rules were adopted and, when existing rules are amended, the filings required by this subsection shall clearly identify the existing rules. The Secretary of State shall endorse on each filing required by this subsection the time and date of the filing and shall maintain a file of the rules for public inspection. The provisions of this subsection relative to rules adopted on or after July 1, 1985, shall not be construed to require a rule to go into effect 20 days after filing with the Secretary of State if the rule, by its own terms, provides for a later effective date. Rules filed with the Secretary of State pursuant to this subsection shall be published by the Secretary of State as a part of the rules of state agencies published by the Secretary of State pursuant to Code Section 50-13-7.

Each board of trustees shall be authorized to adopt rules and regulations which are appropriate or necessary to maintain the qualified status of its respective public retirement and pension system under Sections 401(a) and 414(d) of the federal Internal Revenue Code and such other applicable sections of the federal Internal Revenue Code.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-1-10

, enacted by Ga. L. 1985, p. 1638, § 1; Ga. L. 1990, p. 190, § 2; Ga. L. 2009, p. 947, § 1/HB 202.

The 2009 amendment,

effective May 11, 2009, added subsection (f).

47-1-11.
Creditable service not allowed for military service from which discharge was other than honorable.

As used in this Code section, the term:

“Creditable service” means any period of time which may be used as a factor in the computation of any benefit under a public retirement system.

“Military service” means service in the armed forces of the United States or in a reserve component of the armed forces of the United States, including the National Guard.

“Public employee” means elected and appointed officials and employees of the state or any branch, department, board, bureau, commission, authority, or other agency of the state and elected and appointed officials and employees of any political subdivision of the state or of any authority or other agency of any such political subdivision.

“Public retirement system” means any retirement or pension system now or hereafter created by or pursuant to the authority of Georgia law or the Constitution of Georgia which has public employees as members of the retirement or pension system.

“Source of authority” means the law, resolution, or ordinance which creates or provides for a public retirement system.

Only military service for which a person was discharged or separated under honorable conditions shall be eligible to be counted as military service for the purpose of obtaining creditable service under any public retirement system, whether presently existing or hereafter created, when the source of authority for such public retirement system authorizes military service to be used as a basis to obtain creditable service under such public retirement system.

The provisions of this Code section are a limitation on the use of military service as creditable service under any public retirement system and shall not be construed to create a right to obtain creditable service for military service under any public retirement system when such right does not exist independently of this Code section.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-1-11

, enacted by Ga. L. 1986, p. 1233, § 1.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1986, Code Section 47-1-11, as enacted by Ga. L. 1986, p. 1240, § 1, was redesignated as Code Section 47-1-12.

Law reviews.

For annual survey of local government law, see 38 Mercer L. Rev. 289 (1986).

47-1-12.
Investment and reinvestment of assets of local retirement system; valuation and limitation on investments; duties of state auditor.

The board of trustees of any local retirement system shall have full power to invest and reinvest assets of the retirement system and to purchase, hold, sell, assign, transfer, and dispose of any securities and other investments in which assets of the retirement system have been invested, any proceeds of any investments, and any money belonging to the retirement system; provided, however, that, except as otherwise provided in this Code section, such power shall be subject to all terms, conditions, limitations, and restrictions imposed by Article 7 of Chapter 20 of this title in making and disposing of their investments.

Notwithstanding the provisions of Code Section 33-11-21, the board of trustees of any local retirement system shall not be restricted to investing in those equities which have paid a cash dividend in at least three of the last five years preceding the purchase of such equities.

Nothing in this Code section shall be construed to limit or restrict the authority of the board of trustees of any retirement system to invest or reinvest assets of such system in such manner and under such conditions as are authorized by law.

The state auditor shall monitor the investment activity of local retirement systems and shall submit a report to the Governor and the presiding officer of each chamber of the General Assembly describing the effect, if any, changes in investment policy have had on those systems. Such report shall be submitted not later than December 31, 2001.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-1-12

, enacted by Ga. L. 1986, p. 1240, § 1; Ga. L. 1996, p. 651, § 3; Ga. L. 1998, p. 126, § 1; Ga. L. 2000, p. 2, § 3; Ga. L. 2015, p. 898, § 1/HB 266.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, substituted “Article 7 of Chapter 20 of this title” for “the laws of this state upon domestic life insurance companies” near the end of subsection (a).

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1986, Code Section 47-1-11, as enacted by Ga. L. 1986, p. 1240, § 1, was redesignated as Code Section 47-1-12.

47-1-13.
Maximum compensation used in computing employee and employer contributions.

As used in this Code section, the term “eligible member” means a person who became a member of a public retirement or pension system prior to the plan year beginning after December 31, 1995.

Any other provision of law to the contrary notwithstanding, the maximum compensation used in computing employee and employer contributions to or benefits due from any public retirement or pension system shall be the maximum compensation set forth in Section 401(a)(17) of the federal Internal Revenue Code, as now or hereafter amended; provided, however, that pursuant to Section 13212(d)(3)(A) of the federal Omnibus Budget Reconciliation Act of 1993 and the regulations issued under such section, eligible members are not subject to the limits of Section 401(a)(17) of the federal Internal Revenue Code, and the maximum compensation used for such computations for eligible members shall be the maximum amount allowed by the respective retirement or pension system to be so used on July 1, 1993.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-1-13

, enacted by Ga. L. 1995, p. 351, § 1; Ga. L. 2009, p. 947, § 2/HB 202.

The 2009 amendment,

effective May 11, 2009, in subsection (b), inserted “federal” and inserted “pursuant to Section 13212(d)(3)(A) of the federal Omnibus Budget Reconciliation Act of 1993 and the regulations issued under such section, eligible members are not subject to the limits of Section 401(a)(17) of the federal Internal Revenue Code, and” near the middle, and substituted “members” for “employees” near the end.

U.S. Code.

The United States Internal Revenue Code Section 401(a)(17), referred to in subsection (b), is codified in

26 U.S.C. § 401

.

The Omnibus Budget Reconciliation Act of 1993, referred to in subsection (b), can be found at Pub. L. 103-66.